Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1341
Grade crossing safety; responsibility.

The Department of Transportation, which possesses the requisite engineering expertise, highway and rail planning function, and highway safety mission and is the repository for state and federal funding for both rail and highway projects, shall be the agency responsible for grade crossing safety.

Laws 1997, LB 255, § 13;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 263.